Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-4831
Preclusive effect of anatomical gift,
amendment, or revocation.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this
section and subject to subsection (f) of this section, in the absence of an
express, contrary indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is
barred from making, amending, or revoking an anatomical gift of a donor's
body or part if the donor made an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part
under section 71-4828 or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor's
body or part under section 71-4829.

(b) A donor's
revocation of an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under section
71-4829 is not a refusal and does not bar another person specified in section
71-4827 or 71-4832 from making an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part
under section 71-4828 or 71-4833.

(c) If a person other than the donor has
made an unrevoked anatomical gift of the donor's body or part under section
71-4828 or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part
under section 71-4829, another person who is not the donor may not make, amend,
or revoke the gift of the donor's body or part under section 71-4833.

(d) A revocation
of an anatomical gift of a donor's body or part under section 71-4829 by a
person other than the donor does not bar another person from making an anatomical
gift of the body or part under section 71-4828 or 71-4833.

(e) In the
absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or other person authorized
to make an anatomical gift under section 71-4827, an anatomical gift of a
part is neither a refusal to give another part nor a limitation on the making
of an anatomical gift of another part at a later time by the donor or another
person.

(f) In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor
or other person authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 71-4827,
an anatomical gift of a part for one or more of the purposes set forth in
section 71-4827 is not a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of
the part for any of the other purposes by the donor or any other person under
section 71-4828 or 71-4833.

(g) If a donor who is an unemancipated
minor dies, a parent of the donor who is reasonably available may revoke or
amend an anatomical gift of the donor's body or part.

(h) If an unemancipated
minor who signed a refusal dies, a parent of the minor who is reasonably available
may revoke the minor's refusal.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 8.